src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!! # Faroese adverbs


LEXICON adv
 !!= **@LEXNAME@** for the tag +Adv
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON advcomp
 !!= **@LEXNAME@** for the tag +Adv+Cmp
+Adv+Cmp: # ;

LEXICON advsuperl
 !!= **@LEXNAME@** for the tag +Adv+Superl
+Adv+Superl: # ;

LEXICON Adverb
sunnari advcomp ;
temmiliga adv ;
knappiliga adv ;
alt adv ; ! hava alt ...
beint adv ;
varisligani adv ;
innlendis adv ;
nokkso adv ;
í% meðal adv ;
meðal adv ;
hareftir adv ;
afturút adv ;
óbeinleiðis adv ;
also adv ;
teirramillum adv ;
á% jøvnum% føti adv ;
í% fjør adv ; !!= * @CODE@
um% leið adv ; !MT
suðuri adv ; !!= * @CODE@
útúr adv ; !!= * @CODE@
síðla adv ; !!= * @CODE@
forskelligastaðnar adv ; !!= * @CODE@
onkrastaðnar adv ; !!= * @CODE@
líkafram adv ; !!= * @CODE@
afturíaftur adv ; !! ...
innangarðs adv ;
innanborðs adv ;
niðuraftur adv ;
ovarlaga adv ;
knappligani adv ;
ógviligani adv ;
fyrstani adv ;
ganska adv ;
niðari adv ;
sumrarnar adv ;
ásins adv ;
harniðan adv ;
fleiriferðir adv ;
allatíðir adv ;
samtíðis adv ;
møguligastaðni adv ;
onkusteðs adv ;
útfrá adv ;
forrestin adv ;
hvørjumegin adv ;
sjóvegis adv ;
niðarlaga adv ;
miriliga adv ;
egentliga adv ;
eftirhondini adv ;
javnbjóðis adv ;
allarhelst adv ;
uppímillum adv ;
fremri adv ;
aðruferðirnar adv ;
gudsdoyðirnar adv ;
innantanna adv ;
innanlands adv ;
innfyri adv ;
erva adv ;
samanum adv ;
tilmerkis adv ;
útígjøgnum adv ;
norðanfjørðs adv ;
úteftirni adv ;
yvireftirni adv ;
lukkutíð adv ;
oftast adv ;
innímótir adv ;
útúr adv ;
hinveg adv ;
heryvir adv ;
nátúrligvís adv ;
vist adv ;
annaðstaðnis adv ;
ávikavist adv ;
einastaðni adv ;
fimmtíð adv ;
gjár adv ;
harniðri adv ;
herniðri adv ;
langtfrá adv ;
líkavæl adv ;
niðaneftirni adv ;
niðrifrá adv ;
norðanifrá adv ;
aftanífrá adv ;
framífrá adv ;
innanífrá adv ;
omanífrá adv ;
vestanífrá adv ;
harfyri adv ;
sunnarlaga adv ;
dátt adv ;
serligastaðnis adv ;
tvørtur adv ;
uttanfrá adv ;
øðrvísini adv ;
uttanífrá adv ;
akkurátsum adv ;
allamøguligastaðnis adv ;
allanvegin adv ;
dat adv ;
einsæris adv ;
uttanveggja adv ;
ennnú adv ;
flestastaðni adv ;
haps adv ;
harúti adv ;
heimanífrá adv ;
hips adv ;
ígjøgnum adv ;
innímillum adv ;
mótsettumegin adv ;
nemliga+Err/Orth:nemmiliga adv ;
norð adv ;
onkrastaðnis adv ;
seinri adv ;
slapp-av adv ;
soleiðisna adv ;
suðurífrá adv ;
vesturífrá adv ;
aftanav adv ;
aftaní adv ;
aftanundan adv ;
aftaná adv ;
aftari adv ;
aftur adv ;
afturav adv ;
afturfrá adv ;
afturiav adv ;
afturiígjøgnum adv ;
afturiímóti adv ;
afturiúr adv ;
afturiyvir adv ;
afturiífrá adv ;
afturígjøgnum adv ;
afturímóti adv ;
afturundan adv ;
afturúr adv ;
afturyvir adv ;
aldri adv ;
allastaðni adv ;
alsamt% enn adv ;
altíð adv ;
avbera adv ;
áleið adv ;
aðrastaðni adv ;
beinavegin adv ;
betur advcomp ;
brennandi adv ;
brátt adv ;
burtur adv ;
burturfrá adv ;
báðumegin adv ;
einans adv ;
eisini adv ;
endiliga adv ;
enntá adv ;
eystanav adv ;
eystanfyri adv ;
eystani adv ;
eystanundan adv ;
eystaná adv ;
eystarlega adv ;
eysturav adv ;
eysturfrá adv ;
eysturiav adv ;
eysturiií adv ;
eysturiiímillum adv ;
eysturiiundir adv ;
eysturiivið adv ;
eysturiiá adv ;
eysturií adv ;
eysturiímillum adv ;
eysturiundir adv ;
eysturivið adv ;
eysturiá adv ;
eysturí adv ;
eysturímillum adv ;
eysturum adv ;
eysturundir adv ;
eysturvið adv ;
eysturá adv ;
fram adv ;
framav adv ;
framí adv ;
framímillum adv ;
framleiðis adv ;
frammanav adv ;
frammantil adv ;
frammanúr adv ;
frammanífrá adv ;
frammiav adv ;
frammiímillum adv ;
frammiundir adv ;
frammivið adv ;
frammiá adv ;
framum adv ;
framundir adv ;
framvegis adv ;
framyvir adv ;
framúr adv ;
fyribils adv ;
fyrr adv ; !XXX
fyrru adv ;
fyrrenn adv ;
gjarna adv ;
hagar adv ;
haraftrat adv ;
harav adv ;
harumframt adv ;
haðan adv ;
heima adv ;
heimanav adv ;
heimanfyri adv ;
heimantil adv ;
heimanúr adv ;
heimanífrá adv ;
heimav adv ;
heimfrá adv ;
heimií adv ;
heimiímillum adv ;
heimiundir adv ;
heimivið adv ;
heimiá adv ;
heimí adv ;
heimímillum adv ;
heimum adv ;
heimundir adv ;
undir adv ;
heimvið adv ;
heimá adv ;
helst adv ;
herfyri adv ;
hesaferð adv ; ! XXX check!
higar adv ;
hinumegin adv ;
hiðani adv ;
hvar adv ;
hvussu adv ;
hví adv ;
illa adv ;
innan adv ;
innaneftir adv ;
innanhýsis adv ;
innanímillum adv ;
innanum adv ;
innanundir adv ;
innanyvir adv ;
innanífrá adv ;
innast adv ;
innav adv ;
innfrá adv ;
inniav adv ;
inniígjøgnum adv ;
inniímóti adv ;
inniúr adv ;
inniyvir adv ;
inniífrá adv ;
innígjøgnum adv ;
innímóti adv ;
innundan adv ;
innúr adv ;
innyvir adv ;
innvortis adv ;
ivaleyst adv ;
javna adv ;
júst adv ;
konufólkamegin adv ;
leingi adv ;
longst advsuperl ;
longur advcomp ;
líkasum adv ; !XXX
meir advcomp ; ! XXX now +Comp
meira adv ;
mitt adv ; !XXX
miðal adv ;
munandi adv ;
nakað adv ; !XXX
neyvan adv ;
niðanav adv ;
niðanfrá adv ;
niðaní adv ;
niðanímillum adv ;
niðantil adv ;
niðanundan adv ;
niðanúr adv ;
niðaná adv ;
niðri adv ;
niðrií adv ;
niðriímillum adv ;
niðriundir adv ;
niðrivið adv ;
niðriá adv ;
niður adv ;
niðurav adv ;
niðurfrá adv ;
niðurígjøgnum adv ;
niðurímóti adv ;
niðurundan adv ;
niðurúr adv ;
niðuryvir adv ;
nokk adv ;
norðaneftir adv ;
norðaní adv ;
norðanundan adv ;
norðaná adv ;
norðurat adv ;
norðureftir adv ;
norðuriav adv ;
norðuriígjøgnum adv ;
norðuriímóti adv ;
norðuriúr adv ;
norðuriyvir adv ;
norðuriífrá adv ;
norðurígjøgnum adv ;
norðurímóti adv ;
norðurundan adv ;
norðurúr adv ;
norðuryvir adv ;
nær adv ;
nærum adv ;
nóg adv ;
nøkulunda+Err/Orth:nøkunlunda adv ;
ofta adv ;
innari adv ;
oftast advsuperl ;
omanav adv ;
omanfrá adv ;
omaní adv ;
omanímillum adv ;
omantil adv ;
omanundan adv ;
omanúr adv ;
omanyvir adv ;
omanífrá adv ;
onkursvegna adv ;
ov adv ;
raðid adv ;
rundanum adv ;
saman adv ;
samstundis adv ;
sera adv ;
siðin adv ;
sjáldan adv ; !SUB
sjálvsagt adv ;
snimma adv ;
soleiðis adv ;
sostatt adv ;
straks adv ;
stutt adv ;
umvegis adv ;
sundur adv ; ! XXX morphology here?
sunnaneftir adv ;
sunnaní adv ;
sunnanundan adv ;
sunnaná adv ;
suðurat adv ;
suðureftir adv ;
suðuriav adv ;
suðuriígjøgnum adv ;
suðuriímóti adv ;
suðuriúr adv ;
suðuriyvir adv ;
suðuriífrá adv ;
suðurígjøgnum adv ;
suðurímóti adv ;
suðurundan adv ;
suðurúr adv ;
suðuryvir adv ;
sínámillum adv ;
eftirsíðan adv ;
síðani adv ;
tilsamans adv ; !XXX
tískil adv ;
tíðliga adv ;
umborð adv ;
umsíðir adv ;
uppaftur adv ;
uppav adv ;
uppfrá adv ;
uppiav adv ;
uppiígjøgnum adv ;
uppiímóti adv ;
uppiúr adv ;
uppiyvir adv ;
uppiífrá adv ;
uppígjøgnum adv ;
uppímóti adv ;
uppundan adv ;
uppúr adv ;
uppyvir adv ;
uttanat adv ;
uttanbergs adv ;
uttanborða adv ;
uttaneftir adv ;
uttaní adv ;
uttantil adv ;
uttanyvir adv ;
uttanífrá adv ;
valla adv ;
vestaneftir adv ;
vestaní adv ;
vestantil adv ;
vestanúr adv ;
vestanífrá adv ;
vesturav adv ;
vesturfrá adv ;
vesturiav adv ;
vesturiígjøgnum adv ;
vesturiímóti adv ;
vesturiúr adv ;
vesturiyvir adv ;
vesturiífrá adv ;
vesturígjøgnum adv ;
vesturímóti adv ;
vesturundan adv ;
vesturúr adv ;
vesturyvir adv ;
viðhvørt adv ; !XXX
yvirhøvur adv ;
árunt adv ;
áður adv ;
ístaðin adv ;
ógvuliga adv ;
ókeypis adv ;
øgilega adv ;
øðrvísi adv ;
útat adv ;
úteftir adv ;
úti adv ;
útií adv ;
útiímillum adv ;
útiundir adv ;
útivið adv ;
útiá adv ;
útí adv ;
útímillum adv ;
útum adv ;
útvið adv ;
útá adv ;
í% dag adv ;
norðaftur adv ;
slett adv ;
síðuna adv ;
aðrasteðs adv ;
barastaðnar adv ;
fleiristaðnis adv ;
allasteðs adv ;
allasteðnani adv ;
allíkavæl adv ;
direkta adv ;
eintingum adv ;
forskelligasteðs adv ;
fyrradagin adv ;
harnæst adv ;
hendanvegin adv ;
hesuferðina adv ;
hvørtfall adv ;
kortsíðani adv ;
meðni adv ;
nakrastaðni adv ;
nakrarferðirnar adv ;
niðanaftur adv ;
nógvastaðnis adv ;
oftani adv ;
vissuliga adv ;
í% neðra adv ;
til% høldar adv ;
ofta adv ;
ongastaðna adv ;
onkuntíðirnar adv ;
serligani adv ;
sovorðið adv ;
sovorðnar adv ;
tíðligari adv ;
uppií adv ;
uttanhýsis adv ;
vesturífrá adv ;
sjálvfylgjandi adv ;
simpultenn adv ;
vestur adv ;
afturúr adv ;
beinaveg adv ;
eingong adv ;
rættiliga adv ;
halløj adv ;
hertil adv ;
illani adv ;
innanúr adv ;
norðífrá adv ;
onkutíð adv ;
allasteðsinar adv ;
evri adv ;
sunnari adv ;
vælsaktans adv ;
norðari adv ;
meiri adv ;
netto adv ;
herumframt adv ;
